Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-502
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-503 to 38-509 apply.

Laws 1978, LB 406, § 13;

Laws 1985, LB 129, § 14;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 66;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 130;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,186;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 64;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 188.